North Carolina, session 2025, HB445.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. REINSTATE EDUCATION-BASED SALARY SUPPLEMENTS FOR
TEACHERS AND INSTRUCTIONAL SUPPORT PERSONNEL, INCLUDING SCHOOL
SOCIAL WORKERS
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 115C-302.10 is repealed.
SECTION 1.(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for the 2025-2026
fiscal year, State Board of Education policy TCP-A-006, as it was in effect on June 30, 2013,
shall be used to determine (i) whether teachers and instructional support personnel, including
school social workers, are paid on the "M" salary schedule and (ii) whether they receive a salary
supplement for academic preparation at the six-year or doctoral degree level.
SECTION 1.(c) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction the sum of eight million dollars ($8,000,000) in recurring funds for the
2025-2026 fiscal year to reinstate education-based salary supplements for teachers and
instructional support personnel, including school social workers, in accordance with this section.

PART II. PUBLICIZE MINIMUM SALARY SCHEDULES FOR OCCUPATIONAL
THERAPISTS AND PHYSICAL THERAPISTS
SECTION 2. G.S. 115C-316(b1) reads as rewritten:
"(b1) Every local board of education shall adopt a minimum salary schedule for
occupational therapists and physical therapists employed in full-time, permanent positions. The
minimum salary schedule shall apply to positions paid from State, local, or federal funds. In
accordance with the noncertified salary grades and ranges adopted by the State Board of
Education, the minimum salary schedule shall differentiate salaries based on years of experience,
but experience-based intervals shall be no greater than five years. Local boards of education may
compensate occupational therapists and physical therapists above the minimum salary schedule
provided all State-funded salaries are within the noncertified salary grades and ranges adopted
by the State Board of Education. No later than October 15 of each year, every local board of
*H445-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
education shall publish on its website the salary schedule adopted for occupational therapists and
physical therapists pursuant to this subsection for that school year."

PART III. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
Page 2 House Bill 445-First Edition